Utah statutes.
19-5-122.   Underground wastewater disposal systems -- Fee imposed on new
systems.
(1)  Beginning July 1, 2001, a one-time fee is imposed on each new underground
wastewater disposal system installed.
(2) (a)  From July 1, 2001 through June 30, 2002, the fee shall be $25.
(b)  Beginning July 1, 2002, the fee shall be established by the department in
accordance with Section 63J-1-504.
(3) (a)  The fee shall be paid when plans and specifications for the
construction of a new underground wastewater disposal system are approved by
the local health department or the Department of Environmental Quality.
(b)  A local health department shall remit the fee revenue to the Division of
Finance quarterly.
(4)  The fee revenue shall be:
(a)  deposited into the Underground Wastewater Disposal Restricted Account
created in Section 19-5-123; and
(b)  used to pay for costs of underground wastewater disposal system training
programs.
